District of Columbia statutes.
36-157

Actions in tort permissible.

Nothing in this subchapter shall prevent or restrain any person who is the legal owner of a trademark or label from proceeding in an action of tort against any person found guilty of violating this subchapter.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, ch. 854, § 878g
Feb. 27, 1907, 34 Stat. 1007, ch. 2086

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 48-307.
1973 Ed., § 48-307.